District of Columbia statutes.
47-366

Non-Departmental Fund Transfer Notification.

The Chief Financial Officer shall notify the Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia in writing whenever a reprogramming, transfer, or budget modification of any amount is made involving the Non-Departmental account. The notice shall set forth the amount and purpose of the reprogramming, transfer, or budget modification.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 7022(b), 58 DCR 6226
Short title: Section 7021 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle C of title VII of the act may be cited as “Non-Departmental Fund Transfer Notification Act of 2011”.